Oklahoma, session 2025, SB909.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:



Req. No. 1042 Page 1


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 146.1 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Secure


Telecommunications Act of 2025”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 146.2 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Critical telecommunications infrastructure” shall mean all


physical broadband infrastructure and equipment which supports the


transmission of information of a user’s choosing, regardless of the


transmission medium or technology employed that connects to a


network which permits the end user to engage in communications


including, but not limited to, service provided directly to:


a. the public, or


b. such classes of users as to be effectively available


directly to the public;


2. “Federally banned corporation” shall mean any company or


designated equipment currently banned or at any point hereto banned


at the federal level. This shall include, but not be limited to,


bans resulting from the following federal agencies and acts:


a. the Federal Communications Commission including, but


not limited to, any equipment or service deemed to

Req. No. 1042 Page 2


pose a threat to national security identified on the


Covered List developed pursuant to 47 C.F.R., Section


1.50002, as such act existed July 1, 2024, and


published by the Public Safety and Homeland Security


Bureau of the Federal Communications Commission


pursuant to the federal Secure and Trusted


Communications Networks Act of 2019, 47 U.S.C.,


Section 1601 et seq., as such act existed on July 1,


2024,


b. the U.S. Department of Commerce,


c. the Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency,


d. the Federal Acquisition Security Council, and


e. Section 889 of the John S. McCain National Defense


Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2019 [Pub. L. 115-


232];


3. “Foreign adversary” shall mean any country designated by the


United States Secretary of State as hostile or a Country of


Particular Concern (CPC); and


4. “Telecommunications provider” shall mean any corporation,


public or private, which operates any system which supports the


transmission of information of a user’s choosing regardless of the


transmission medium or technology employed that connects to a


network which permits the end user to engage in communications


including, but not limited to, service provided directly to:

Req. No. 1042 Page 3


a. the public, or


b. such classes of users as to be effectively available


directly to the public.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 146.3 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. All critical telecommunications infrastructure located


within or serving this state shall not utilize any equipment


manufactured by a federally banned corporation, nor any equipment


banned at the federal level.


B. All critical telecommunications infrastructure located


within or serving this state shall not utilize any equipment


manufactured in or by, including any equipment whose critical or


necessary components are manufactured in or by a foreign adversary,


a state-owned enterprise of a foreign adversary, or a company


domiciled within a foreign adversary.


C. All critical telecommunications infrastructure in operation


within or serving this state, to include any critical


telecommunications infrastructure which is not permanently disabled,


shall have all equipment prohibited by subsection A or B of this


section removed and replaced with equipment which is not prohibited


by subsection A or B of this section. Any telecommunications


provider that removes, discontinues, or replaces any prohibited


telecommunications equipment or service shall not be required to

Req. No. 1042 Page 4


obtain any additional permits from any state agency or political


subdivision for the removal, discontinuance, or replacement of such


communications equipment or service as long as the state agency or


political subdivision is properly notified of the necessary


replacements and the replacement communications equipment is similar


to the existing communications equipment.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 146.4 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any telecommunications provider providing service in this


state shall file a registration form with and pay a registration fee


to the Corporation Commission by September 1, 2025, and then on


January 1 of each year henceforth. Any communications provider


shall register with the Commission prior to providing service. The


Commission shall prescribe the registration form to be filed


pursuant to this section.


B. A telecommunications provider shall provide the Commission


with the name, address, telephone number, and email address of a


person with managerial responsibility for the provider’s operations


within this state.


C. A telecommunications provider shall:


1. Submit a registration fee at the time the registration form


is submitted. The Commission shall set the fee in an amount



Req. No. 1042 Page 5


sufficient to cover the costs of administering the registration


process, but such fee shall not exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00);


2. Keep the information required by this section current and


notify the Commission of any changes to such information within


sixty (60) days after the change; and


3. Certify to the Commission by January 1 each year that all


critical telecommunications equipment and infrastructure within its


operation does not use or provide any communications equipment or


service prohibited pursuant to Section 3 of this act.


D. The Commission shall administratively fine any


telecommunications provider which violates this section with a fine


no less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per day and no


greater than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) per day of


noncompliance.


E. The Commission shall administratively fine any


telecommunications provider which knowingly submits a false


registration form described in this section with a fine no less than


Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per day and no greater than One


Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) per day of noncompliance.


F. Any telecommunications provider that fails to comply with


this section is prohibited from receiving any state or local funds


for the development or support of new or existing critical


telecommunications infrastructure, including the Oklahoma Universal


Service Fund, and is prohibited from receiving any federal funds

Req. No. 1042 Page 6


subject to distribution by state or local governments for the


development or support of new or existing critical


telecommunications infrastructure.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1042 CN 1/19/2025 5:45:45 AM





























Req. No. 1042 Page 7